apertium-swe-nor.swe.twol
Alphabet

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö  
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z å ä ö  

 A1:a ! Used for a:0 alternations in certain contexts.
 E1:e ! Used for e:0 alternations in certain contexts.
 D1:d ! Used for d:t alternations in front of t

 %>:0
 %  ! Don't remove - space declared as part of the alphabet
 ;

Sets

Vow =
 A       E       I           O           U           Å Ä Ö  
 a       e       i           o           u           å ä ö  
 ;

Con = 

   B C D   F G H   J K L M N   P Q R S T   V W X   Z
   b c d   f g h   j k l m n   p q r s t   v w x   z
;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Delete second syllable e when suffix is a full syllable"
x:0 <=> :Con ( :0 ) _ Con+ Vow ;
        where x in ( A1 E1 ) ;

"d goes to t in front of t suffix"
D1:t <=> _ :t ;

"Collapse geminate in front of deleted syllable"
m:0 <=> m _ x:0 ;
        where x in ( A1 E1 ) ;
